Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.176

Disability or retirement payments—Construction.

The provisions of *this act are intended to be remedial and procedural and any benefits heretofore paid to recipients hereunder pursuant to any previous act are retroactively included and authorized as part of *this act.

[ 1959 c 9 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this act" appears in 1959 c 9, which is codified as RCW 41.24.175 and 41.24.176.